fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Camping et randonnée: Matériel de camping; Ustensiles et vaisselle de cuisine pour le camping; Accessoires pour hamac de camping; Hamacs de camping; Lampes et lanternes de camping; Réchauds de camping; Outils de camping; Chauffe-mains chimiques; Sacs de compression; Accessoires pour bâtons de marche; Bâtons de marche; Moustiquaires et écrans anti-insectes; Boussoles de navigation; Accessoires de boussoles de navigation; Toilettes et douches mobiles; Filtres portables et épurateurs d'eau; Doublures pour sacs de couchage; Sacs de couchage; Matelas de sol; Accessoires de tente; Tentes; Cartes de sentiers et topographiques; Accessoires de paravents; Pare-vents
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Acampamento e caminhada: Móveis para camping; Panelas e louça para camping; Acessórios para redes de acampamento; Redes de acampamento; Luzes e lanternas para camping; Fogareiros de acampamento; Ferramentas para camping; Aquecedores químicos de mão; Sacos de compressão; Acessórios para bastões de caminhada; Bastões para caminhada; Mosquiteiros e telas; Bússolas de navegação; Acessórios para bússolas de navegação; Chuveiros e banheiros portáteis; Filtros e purificadores de água portáteis; Forros para saco de dormir; Sacos de dormir; Colchonetes para saco de dormir; Acessórios para barracas; Barracas; Mapas de trilhas e topográficos; Acessórios para quebra-ventos; Jaquetas corta-vento
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Retkeily ja vaellus: Retkikalusteet; Retkikeittimet ja -astiat; Retkeilyriippumattojen tarvikkeet; Retkeilyriippumatot; Retkivalaisimet ja -lyhdyt; Retkikeittimet; Retkityökalut; Kemialliset kädenlämmittimet; Kompressiosäkit; Vaellussauvatarvikkeet; Vaellussauvat; Hyttysverkot ja hyönteissuojat; Navigointikompassit; Suuntakompassien lisävarusteet; Kannettavat WC:t ja suihkut; Kannettavat vesisuodattimet ja puhdistuslaitteet; Makuupussin sisäpussit; Makuupussit; Makuualustat; Telttatarvikkeet; Teltat; Reitti- ja maastokartat; Tuulisuojien lisävarusteet; Tuulisuojat
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Kamperen en wandelen: Kampeermeubilair; Kookgereedschap en borden en bestek voor kamperen; Accessoires voor kampeerhangmat; Kampeerhangmatten; Kamperverlichting en -lantaarns; Campingkooktoestellen; Kampeerartikelen; Chemische handverwarmers; Compressiezakken; Accessoires voor wandelstokken; Wandelstokken; Muskietennetten en insectengaas; Navigatiekompassen; Accessoires voor navigatiekompassen; Mobiele wc's en douches; Draadbare waterfilters en zuiveringstoestellen; Slaapzakbinnenhoezen; Slaapzakken; Kampeermatten; Tentaccessoires; Tenten; Wandel- en topografische kaarten; Accessoires voor windschermen; Windschermen
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Campismo e caminhada: Mobiliário de campismo; Utensílios e louça de campismo; Acessórios para redes de campismo; Redes de campismo; Lanternas e luzes de campismo; Fogões de campismo; Ferramentas de campismo; Aquecedores de mãos químicos; Sacos de compressão; Acessórios de bastões de caminhada; Bastões de caminhada; Mosquiteiros e redes para insetos; Bússolas; Acessórios para bússolas de navegação; Chuveiros e sanitas portáteis; Purificadores e filtros de água portáteis; Forros de sacos-cama; Sacos-cama; Colchonetes; Acessórios para tenda; Tendas; Mapas de trilhos e topográficos; Acessórios para para-ventos; Para-ventos
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Kampiranje i planinarenje: Namještaj za kamp; Posuđe za kuhanje i jelo za kampiranje; Dodaci za viseće mreže za kampiranje; Viseće mreže za kampiranje; Svjetla i lampioni za kampiranje; Kuhala za kampiranje; Alati za kampiranje; Kemijski grijači za ruke; Kompresirane torbe; Pribor za štapove za planinarenje; Štapovi za planinarenje; Mreže protiv komaraca i insekata; Navigacijski kompasi; Dodaci za navigacijske kompase; Prijenosni zahodi i tuševi; Prijenosni filtri i pročistači vode; Ulošci za vreće za spavanje; Vreće za spavanje; Podloge za spavanje; Dodaci za šatore; Šatori; Karte staza i topografske karte; Dodaci za vjetrobrane; Vjetrobrani
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Kempování a turistika: Kempinkový nábytek; Kempinkové nádobí a jídelní sady; Kempinkové houpací sítě – příslušenství; Kempinkové houpací sítě; Kempinková světla a lucerny; Kempingové vařiče; Kempinkové vybavení; Chemické ohřívače rukou; Kompresní vaky; Turistické hole – příslušenství; Turistické hole; Moskytiéry a sítě proti hmyzu; Kompasy; Příslušenství k navigačním kompasům; Přenosné toalety a sprchy; Přenosné vodní filtry a čističky; Vložky do spacích pytlů; Spací pytle; Spací podložky; Stany – příslušenství; Stany; Turistické a topografické mapy; Příslušenství k zástěnám proti větru; Zástěny
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Campeggio e trekking: Attrezzatura da campeggio; Pentole e stoviglie da campeggio; Accessori per amaca da campeggio; Amache da campeggio; Luci e lampade da campeggio; Fornelli da campeggio; Strumenti da campeggio; Scaldamani chimici; Sacche a compressione; Accessori per bastoncini trekking; Bastoni da trekking; Zanzariere; Bussole da navigazione; Accessori per bussole da navigazione; Docce e toilette portatili; Filtri e purificatori portatili acqua; Fodere per sacchi a pelo; Sacchi a pelo; Materassini per dormire; Accessori per tende; Tende; Mappe escursionistiche e topografiche; Accessori per frangivento; Protezioni contro il vento
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Camping, vandring och backpacking: Campingmöbler; Kokkärl och bestick för camping; Tillbehör till hängmatta; Campinghängmattor; Campinglampor och lyktor; Campingkök; Campingutrustning; Kemiska handvärmare; Kompressionspåsar; Tillbehör till vandringsstavar; Vandringsstavar; Myggnät; Kompasser; Tillbehör för navigationskompasser; Portabla toaletter och duschar; Portabla vattenfilter och vattenrenare; Lakanpåsar till sovsäckar; Sovsäckar; Liggunderlag; Tälttillbehör; Tält; Ledkartor och topografiska kartor; Tillbehör för vindskydd; Vindskydd
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キャンプ ・ハイキング: キャンプ用家具; キャンプ用調理器具・食器類; キャンプ用ハンモック関連用品; キャンプ用ハンモック; キャンプ用ライト・ランタン; キャンプ用ストーブ・バーナー; キャンプ用品; カイロ; コンプレッションサック; トレッキングポール関連用品; トレッキングポール; 蚊帳; 方位磁石; コンパスアクセサリー; 携帯トイレ・シャワー; 携帯用浄水器; 寝袋ライナー; 寝袋; スリーピングマット; テント関連用品; テント; トレイルマップ・地形図; ウインドスクリーンアクセサリー; ウインドスクリーン
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Camping & Hiking: Camp Furniture; Camping Cookware & Dinnerware; Camping Hammock Accessories; Camping Hammocks; Camping Lights & Lanterns; Camping Stoves; Camping Tools; Chemical Hand Warmers; Compression Sacks; Hiking Pole Accessories; Hiking Poles; Mosquito Nets & Insect Screens; Navigational Compasses; Navigational Compasses Accessories; Portable Toilets & Showers; Portable Water Filters & Purifiers; Sleeping Bag Liners; Sleeping Bags; Sleeping Pads; Tent Accessories; Tents; Trail & Topographic Maps; Windbreak Accessories; Windbreaks
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kempovanie a turistika: Kempovací nábytok; Kempingový riad a potreby na stolovanie; Príslušenstvo pre kempingovú hojdaciu sieť; Kempingové hojdacie siete; Kempingové svetlá a lampáše; Kempingové variče; Kempingové nástroje; Chemické ohrievače rúk; Kompresné vrecia; Príslušenstvo pre turistické palice; Turistické palice; Moskytiéry a siete proti hmyzu; Navigačné kompasy; Príslušenstvo k navigačným kompasom; Prenosné toalety a sprchy; Prenosné vodné filtre a čističky; Vložky do spacích vakov; Spacie vaky; Spacie podložky; Príslušenstvo pre stany; Stany; Turistické a topografické mapy; Príslušenstvo k vetrolamom; Vetrolamy
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kemping és túrázás: Tábori bútorok; Kempingedények és -étkészletek; Kempingfüggőágy-kiegészítők; Kempingfüggőágyak; Kempinglámpák és -lámpások; Kempingfőzők; Kempingszerszámok; Kémiai kézmelegítők; Kompressziós zsákok; Túrabot-kiegészítők; Túrabotok; Szúnyoghálók és rovarhálók; Navigációs iránytűk; Tájoló- és iránytű-kiegészítők; Hordozható WC-k és zuhanyzók; Hordozható vízszűrők és -tisztítók; Hálózsákbélések; Hálózsákok; Hálóbetétek; Sátorkiegészítők; Sátrak; Túra- és topográfiai térképek; Szélfogó-kiegészítők; Szélfogók
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Къмпинг и туризъм: Къмпинг мебели; Къмпинг съдове за готвене и хранене; Аксесоари за къмпинг хамак; Къмпинг хамаци; Къмпинг светлини и фенери; Фурни за къмпинг; Къмпинг инструменти; Химически нагреватели за ръце; Компресионни торби; Аксесоари за туристически щеки; Туристически щеки; Мрежи против комари и насекоми; Навигационни компаси; Аксесоари за навигационни компаси; Преносими тоалетни и душове; Преносими филтри и пречистватели за вода; Подплата за спален чувал; Спални чували; Подложки за спане; Аксесоари за палатки; Палатки; Трасета и топографски карти; Аксесоари за ветроупорни екрани; Ветрозащитни прегради
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 野营与远足: 野营家具; 野营炊具与餐具; 露营吊床配件; 露营吊床; 营地灯/灯具; 露营炉具; 野营工具; 保暖贴; 压缩袋; 登山杖配件; 登山杖; 防蚊帐/门帘/纱窗; 指南针; 导航指南针配件; 移动厕所/淋浴房; 便携式滤水器/净化器; 睡袋内衬; 睡袋; 睡垫; 帐篷配件; 帐篷; 步道与地形图; 挡风板配件; 挡风屏
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Camping & Wandern: Campingmöbel; Camping-Töpfe & -Geschirr; Zubehör für Campinghängematten; Campinghängematten; Campingleuchten & -laternen; Campingkocher; Campinghilfsmittel; Taschenwärmer; Kompressionssäcke; Zubehör für Trekkingstöcke; Trekkingstöcke; Moskitonetze & Fliegengitter; Navigationskompasse; Zubehör für Navigationskompasse; Mobile Toiletten & Duschen; Tragbare Wasserfilter & Wasserreiniger; Innenschlafsack; Schlafsäcke; Isomatten; Zeltzubehör; Zelte; Wander- & topografische Karten; Zubehör für Windschutz; Windschutz
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การตั้งแคมป์และเดินเขา: เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับการตั้งแคมป์; อุปกรณ์ทำอาหารและบนโต๊ะอาหารสำหรับการตั้งแคมป์; อุปกรณ์เสริมเปลญวนสำหรับตั้งแคมป์; เปลญวนสำหรับตั้งแคมป์; ไฟและตะเกียงสำหรับการตั้งแคมป์; เตาแคมป์ปิ้ง; เครื่องมือสำหรับการตั้งแคมป์; ที่อุ่นมือ; ถุงบีบอัด; อุปกรณ์ไม้เท้าเดินป่า; ไม้เท้าเดินป่า; ที่กันแมลงและมุ้งกันยุง; เข็มทิศ; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเข็มทิศนำทาง; ห้องน้ำและที่อาบน้ำเคลื่อนที่; เครื่องกรองน้ำและเครื่องทำน้ำให้บริสุทธิ์แบบพกพา; ที่บุถุงนอน; ถุงนอน; แผ่นรองนอน; อุปกรณ์เต็นท์; เต็นท์; แผนที่เส้นทางและภูมิประเทศ; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับฉากกันลม; แผ่นกันลม
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Camping og vandreture: Campingmøbler; Campingkogegrej og -spisestel; Tilbehør til campinghængekøje; Campinghængekøjer; Campingbelysning og lanterner; Kogeapparater til camping; Campingredskaber; Kemiske håndvarmere; Kompressionssoveposer; Vandrestav – tilbehør; Vandrestave; Myggenet; Kompasser; Tilbehør til navigationskompasser; Flytbare toiletter og brusere; Transportable vandfiltre og vandrensere; Snore til soveposer; Soveposer; Liggeunderlag; Telttilbehør; Telte; Vandrekort og topografiske kort; Tilbehør til læsejl; Oversejl
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κατασκήνωση & πεζοπορία: Έπιπλα κατασκήνωσης; Σκεύη μαγειρικής & σερβιρίσματος κατασκήνωσης; Αξεσουάρ αιώρας κάμπινγκ; Αιώρες κάμπινγκ; Φωτιστικά & φανάρια κατασκήνωσης; Εστίες μαγειρέματος κάμπινγκ; Εργαλεία κατασκήνωσης; Χημικά θερμαντικά χεριών; Σάκοι συμπίεσης; Αξεσουάρ μπατόν πεζοπορίας; Μπατόν πεζοπορίας; Κουνουπιέρες & δίχτυα; Πυξίδες πλοήγησης; Αξεσουάρ πυξίδων πλοήγησης; Φορητές τουαλέτες & ντους; Φορητά φίλτρα & καθαριστές νερού; Επενδύσεις υπνόσακου; Υπνόσακοι; Υποθέματα ύπνου; Αξεσουάρ σκηνών; Σκηνές; Πεζοπορικοί και τοπογραφικοί χάρτες; Αξεσουάρ ανεμοθραυστών; Προστατευτικά από τον άνεμο
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 露營和健行: 露營裝備; 露營炊具和餐具; 露營吊床配件; 露營吊床; 露營燈具; 露營爐具; 露營工具; 暖暖包; 壓縮袋; 登山杖配件; 健行杖; 防蚊網/防蟲紗窗; 指南針; 導航指南針配件; 流動浴廁; 可攜式濾水器/淨水器; 睡袋內套; 睡袋; 睡墊; 帳篷配件; 帳篷; 步道與地形圖; 擋風陣幕配件; 擋風牆
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kampiranje in pohodništvo: Pohištvo za kampiranje; Kuhinjska in jedilna posoda za kampiranje; Dodatki za viseče mreže za kampiranje; Viseče mreže za kampiranje; Luči in svetilke za kampiranje; Kuhalniki za kampiranje; Orodja za kampiranje; Kemični grelci za roke; Vakuumske vrečke; Dodatki za pohodne palice; Pohodne palice; Mreže proti komarjem in zaščita pred žuželkami; Magnetni navigacijski kompasi; Dodatki za magnetne navigacijske kompase; Prenosna stranišča in prhe; Prenosni filtri in čistilci vode; Podloge za spalne vreče; Spalne vreče; Spalne podloge; Dodatki za šotore; Šotori; Pohodniški in topografski zemljevidi; Dodatki za vetrne pregrade; Vetrne pregrade
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Camping i chodzenie po górach: Meble kempingowe; Turystyczne akcesoria kuchenne; Akcesoria do hamaków kempingowych; Hamaki kempingowe; Oświetlenie kempingowe; Kuchenki turystyczne; Narzędzia kempingowe; Chemiczne ogrzewacze dłoni; Worki kompresyjne; Akcesoria kijków trekkingowych; Kijki trekkingowe; Moskitiery; Kompasy; Akcesoria do kompasów nawigacyjnych; Przenośne toalety i prysznice; Przenośne filtry i oczyszczacze do wody; Wkładki do śpiworów; Śpiwory; Maty kempingowe; Akcesoria do namiotów; Namioty; Mapy turystyczne i topograficzne; Akcesoria do parawanów turystycznych; Parawany
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Camping y senderismo: Mobiliario de camping; Vajillas y utensilios de cocina para camping; Accesorios para hamacas colgantes; Hamacas colgantes; Faroles y lámparas de camping; Estufas de camping; Herramientas de camping; Calientamanos químicos; Sacos de compresión; Accesorios de bastones de senderismo; Bastones de senderismo; Mosquiteras; Brújulas; Accesorios para brújulas de navegación; Duchas y retretes portátiles; Purificadores y filtros de agua portátiles; Fundas para saco de dormir; Sacos de dormir; Colchonetas para dormir; Accesorios para tiendas de campaña; Tiendas de campaña; Mapas de senderos y topográficos; Accesorios para paravientos; Paravientos
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kampçılık ve Doğa Yürüyüşü: Kamp Mobilyaları; Kamp Pişirme Gereçleri ve Yemek Takımları; Kamp Hamak Aksesuarları; Kamp Hamakları; Kamp Işık ve Fenerleri; Kamp ocakları; Kampçılık Aletleri; Kimyasal El Isıtıcılar; Sıkıştırma Perlonları; Yürüyüş Batonu Aksesuarları; Yürüyüş Batonları; Sivrisinek Ağları ve Sineklikler; Pusulalar; Yön bulma pusulası aksesuarları; Taşınabilir Tuvaletler ve Duşlar; Portatif Su Filtreleri ve Arıtıcılar; Uyku Tulumu Astarları; Uyku Tulumları; Uyku Matları; Çadır Aksesuarları; Çadırlar; Patika ve topografik haritalar; Rüzgarlık aksesuarları; Rüzgar Siperleri
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 캠핑/하이킹: 캠핑 용품; 캠핑용 조리 기구/식기류; 캠핑 해먹 부대용품; 캠핑 해먹; 캠핑 등/랜턴; 캠핑용 스토브; 캠핑 도구; 화학반응 방식 손난로; 압축백; 등산 지팡이 부대용품; 등산 지팡이; 모기장/방충망; 나침반; 나침반 액세서리; 휴대용 변기/샤워기; 휴대용 정수 필터/정수기; 슬리핑백 내피; 침낭; 침낭 깔개; 텐트 부대용품; 텐트; 트레일 및 지형도; 방풍막 액세서리; 윈드브레이크
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Кемпинги и походы: Кемпинговая мебель; Походные столовые приборы и посуда; Аксессуары для кемпинговых гамаков; Кемпинговые гамаки; Кемпинговые лампы и фонари; Туристические горелки и плиты; Инструменты для походов и кемпинга; Химические грелки для рук; Компрессионные мешки; Аксессуары для трекинговых палок; Трекинговые палки; Москитные сетки-палатки; Компасы; Аксессуары для навигационных компасов; Походные души и туалеты; Портативные фильтры и таблетки для очистки воды; Вкладыши для спальных мешков; Спальные мешки; Туристические коврики; Аксессуары для палаток; Палатки; Туристические и топографические карты; Аксессуары для ветрозащитных экранов; Ветрозащитные экраны
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Cắm trại & Đi bộ đường dài: Đồ cắm trại; Dụng cụ nấu nướng & Bộ đồ ăn cắm trại; Phụ kiện võng cắm trại; Võng cắm trại; Đèn chiếu sáng & đèn mini cắm trại; Bếp cắm trại; Dụng cụ cắm trại; Miếng, túi giữ nhiệt; Túi nén đựng đồ; Phụ kiện gậy leo núi; Gậy đi bộ đường dài; Mùng màn & khung rào chống côn trùng; La bàn; Phụ kiện la bàn điều hướng; Nhà vệ sinh và phòng tắm di động; Dụng cụ lọc nước du lịch; Tấm lót túi ngủ; Túi ngủ; Đệm ngủ; Phụ kiện lều trại; Lều; Bản đồ đường mòn và bản đồ địa hình; Phụ kiện tấm chắn gió; Tấm chắn gió
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Camping og fjellvandring: Campingmøbler; Matlagningsutstyr for camping; Tilbehør til campinghengekøye; Campinghengekøyer; Campinglys og lanterner; Turkjøkken; Campingverktøy; Kjemiske håndvarmere; Kompresjonssekker; Tilbehør for gangstaver; Gangstaver; Myggnett og insektsskjerming; Navigasjonskompasser; Tilbehør til navigasjonskompasser; Portable toaletter og dusjer; Portable vannfiltre og purifikatorer; Soveposetrekk; Soveposer; Liggeunderlag; Telttilbehør; Telt; Tur- og topografiske kart; Tilbehør til vindskjerm; Vindstoppere
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Stovyklavimas ir žygiai: Stovyklos baldai; Stovyklavimo indai; Stovyklavimo hamakų priedai; Stovyklavimo hamakai; Kempingo žibintuvėliai ir žibintai; Stovyklavimo viryklės; Stovyklavimo įrankiai; Cheminiai rankų šildytuvai; Kompresiniai maišai; Žygių lazdų priedai; Žygių lazdos; Tinklai nuo uodų ir vabzdžių; Navigaciniai kompasai; Navigacinių kompasų priedai; Nešiojamieji tualetai ir dušai; Nešiojamieji vandens filtrai ir valytuvai; Miegmaišių įklotai; Miegmaišiai; Turistiniai kilimėliai; Palapinių priedai; Palapinės; Takų ir topografiniai žemėlapiai; Užtvarų nuo vėjo priedai; Vėjo užtvaros
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Camping și drumeții: Mobilier de camping; Vase de gătit și veselă pentru camping; Accesorii hamace de camping; Hamace de camping; Lumini și lanterne pentru camping; Aragaze de camping; Unelte pentru camping; Încălzitoare pentru mâini; Saci de compresie; Accesorii pentru bețe de drumeție; Bețe de drumeție; Plase pentru țânțari și insecte; Busole pentru navigație; Accesorii pentru busole de navigație; Toalete și dușuri portabile; Filtre și purificatoare de apă portabile; Inserții pentru sacul de dormit; Saci de dormit; Covorașe pentru dormit; Accesorii pentru corturi; Corturi; Hărți de traseu și topografice; Accesorii pentru paravane de protecție la vânt; Apărători de vânt